District of Columbia statutes.
33-441

Repealed

Continuing partnership business — Rights of retiring or estate of deceased partner.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 647, Pub. L. 87-709, § 42
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-141.
1973 Ed., § 41-341.